Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-377
Payment to person selling stock prohibited; exception.

No corporation organized for the purpose of conducting a savings and loan association under the laws of this state shall be granted a certificate of approval if there have been any premium, bonus, commission, compensation, reward, salary, or other forms of remuneration paid or promised to be paid, to any person for selling the stock of such corporation, except that reasonable compensation in the form of commissions may be paid to persons or organizations authorized by law to act as brokers of stock for acting in such capacity.

Laws 1981, LB 500, § 22.